examples/pdnm/non-standard-hyphenation-german/nstd-hyph-de-1901.pat.txt
.al2lo
.ep2
.hal4
.il2
.öl2
.tal4
.zel5lei
ac1kar
ac3ken
ac3ker
al2lad
al5later
al1lau
al1leh
al3lenk
al1lok
al1los
al1lö
al1luf
al1lüs
am1mac
am3mana
am1mas
am1maß
am3mate
am1met
am1mod
am1mü
arif2
ar1rec
ar1rek
artel5li
at1tal
at2tan
at1tec
at3teil
äm1ma
bal3lan
bal8lehre.
bal8lehren
bal3lig
b1bese
bel2
ben2
bet1to
bit1ta
brüc3ke
c1ka.
c1ke
cken4
c3ker.
c3kere
c3kern
c1ki
c1ku
del5land
del2le
del3ler
del1lö
döl2
drüc3ke
dtam2
eal2
eam4
ec1ka
ec1ko
edel2
ef1fä
ein2
eit2
e2l
el1lap
el1lil
el1log
el1lot
el1lum
el1lü
em1map
em1mat
en1nes
ep1pa
ep1pin
etal7lini
et1tas
et1tä
et1teu
et1the
et1ton
et1tö
et1tur
et1tür
2fa.
2fabf
2fal
fal3lag
fal3lei
fal1li
2fam
2fan
2fap
2far
far3reg
2fas.
2fat
2fau
2fe.
2fen
fet3tei
f3farb
ffel2
f1fetz
f1fil
f1fö
flam6
2ford
2fox
gam2
gel2
hal3lei
hel2la
hen2
hil2
hl2
hnec3
hol2
hrüc3ke
hul2
ial2
ic3ken
ic3ki
ic1ky
iel2
if1fa
if5feste
if1fo
i2k
il1leg
im1mod
in1neu
in1niv
ip1pun
ir1rei
ir1rel
ital4
it1tan
it1tec
it3temp
2kac
2kada
2kadr
1kag
2kal2
2kan
2kau
kblat1
2keff
2kehe
2kei
kel2
2kemp
ken3num
4kense
2kent
4kente.
4kenten
3kerc
4kergeb
4kerhö
4kerlau
4kerleb
2kero
2kerr
2kerz.
2kese
2kex
2kid
2kim
2kind
2kop
2kum
2kunt
2kup
2lab
2lado
lam5meng
2lamt
4lanh
4lann
2lant
2lar
2laufb
2laufg
2laufk
2laufn
2lauto
2lämt
2läs
2leba
4leig
4leim
4lein
len2
let3tei
2leur
2lic.
2lik
2lind
2lins
1lipo
4lis.
l1lad
l1lame
l1lamp
l1lauf
l1law
l1lä
l1leb
l1leib
l1lese
l1leu
l1lic
l1lieb
l1lieg
l1loc
l1lod
l1loh
l1lud
l3lup
l1lüc
l1lüd
lm2
2lodr
2löfe
2löh
2löse
lüc3ke
1magm
2mak
mal2
4manal
mat2
2mata
2män
2mein
2meise
mel2
4mes.
mil2
mit2
m1mä
m1mec
m1meh
m1mei
m1menü
m1mit
m1mol
m1mor
m1mus
mpot1t
nal2
nal3lu
nar2
nel1la
nel3lif
net2
nit3tie
nnbet3t
nul3lei
4nume
nzel4
obal2
oc1ka
oc2kar
oc3ken
of1fa
of1fir
of1fix
of1fo
of1fü
ol1las
ol1lei
ol1log
ol1lö
om2
ödel2
öf1fa
öl1la
2pab
pal2
2pau
pel2
pen2
per1ra
per1rä
per3ric
per3rie
pol2
p1pul
2pung
pül2
ral2
2ran
rec2ka
rec3ken
2rele
ret2
4ries
rit3tei
rm2
rol5lini
rol3lis
rtel5lei
rum3mes
sal2
sam2
sel2
sol1la
stof7fens
syl2
tal3lag
tal3leg
tal3lei
tal3let
tal5lins
tal3lus
tam1ma
tam1mi
tam3mut
2tanb
4tein
tel2
tel5list
ten2
2tes
tfal2
2ther
tim3mat
t1tanz
t1tän
t1tus
tuf1fe
tüc3ke
tüc6kers
ual2
uc3ker
uel1la
ul1lag
ul1lin
ul1lö
um2
üc2ker
ül1lag
ül1las
ül2lau
ül1lei
vel2
vil2
vol3lab
vol8lauf.
wal2
wal3lin
wet1ta
wic3ka
win3num
wol1la
xtbloc4
yl1lo
yl1lö
zel3lag
zel3leh
zel3lin
zen2
zol1la
zol1li
